Maryland, session 2025, HB1445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
7–407.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER” MEANS A SPOUSE,
CHILD, SIBLING, PARENT, GRANDPARENT, GRANDCHILD, STEPPARENT, STEPCHILD,
AND STEPSIBLING.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1445*

HOUSE BILL 1445
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE A FACT SHEET THAT
PROVIDES INFORMATION ABOUT:
(I) THE LEGAL ISSUES RELATED TO DEEDS, HEIRS, AND THE
OWNERSHIP OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY FOLLOWING THE DEATH OF A
HOMEOWNER, COMMONLY KNOWN AS A TANGLED TITLE;
(II) HOW AN INDIVIDUAL CAN ADDRESS THE LEGAL ISSUES IN
ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
(III) THE LEGAL RESOURCES AND FREE OR LOW–COST SERVICES
THAT ARE AVAILABLE TO LOW–INCOME INDIVIDUALS IN THE AREAS OF PROBATE
LAW AND ESTATE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE THE FACT SHEET IN A PRINTABLE FORMAT FROM
ITS WEBSITE; AND
(II) AS NEEDED, UPDATE THE FACT SHEET.
(C) DURING THE COURSE OF PROVIDING FUNERAL SERVICES TO A
CONSUMER, A LICENSED FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT SHALL PROVIDE A PRINTED
COPY OF THE FACT SHEET PUBLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO
THE IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBERS OF THE DECEASED OR THE AUTHORIZED
REPRESENTATIVE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.